District of Columbia statutes.
4-561.16

No private right of action.

This subchapter shall not be construed to create a private right of action or serve as the basis for excluding otherwise admissible evidence in a criminal proceeding.

Nov. 20, 2014, D.C. Law 20-139, § 216, 61 DCR 5913

History

Section 301 of Law 20-139 provided that the Mayor, pursuant to Title I of the District of Columbia Administrative Procedure Act, approved October 21, 1968 (82 Stat. 1204; D.C. Official Code § 2-501 et seq.), may issue rules to implement the provisions of the act.

Editor's Notes